Utah statutes.
41-1a-505.   Exceptions to title requirements for vessels and outboard
motors.
(1)  Each vessel or outboard motor, identified by the manufacturer as a 1985
year model or newer, operated on the waters of this state  is subject to the
title provisions of this part except:
(a)  vessels that have valid marine documents issued by the United States
Coast Guard;
(b)  canoes;
(c)  inflatable vessels powered by an outboard motor with a manufacturer's
listed horsepower of 25 or less;
(d)  outboard motors with a manufacturer's listed horsepower of 25 or less;
(e)  vessels and outboard motors owned and operated by nonresidents of the
state;
(f)  vessels or outboard motors owned and operated by the federal government;
or
(g)  vessels exempt from registration under Section 73-18-9.
(2)  The division may not  provide a title on vessels and outboard motors
identified by the manufacturer as a 1984 year model or older.
